Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/kik_KE.aff
FLAG num
# All Noun Classes Subject, Assumed Object, Current Future/Past within the day -kũ
PFX 614 Y 202
PFX 614 0 ngũ [^aeĩouũ] 
PFX 614 a ngwa a
PFX 614 e ngwe e
PFX 614 ĩ ngwĩ ĩ
PFX 614 o nguo o
PFX 614 ũ ngũ ũ
PFX 614 0 tũkũ [bghmnr]
PFX 614 0 tũgũ [ckt]
PFX 614 a tũkwa a[^ckt]
PFX 614 a tũgwa a[ckt]
PFX 614 e tũkwa e[^ckt]
PFX 614 e tũgwe e[ckt]
PFX 614 i tũkũi i[^ckt]
PFX 614 i tũgũi i[ckt]
PFX 614 ĩ tũkwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 614 ĩ tũgwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 614 o tũkuo o[^ckt]
PFX 614 o tũguo o[ckt]
PFX 614 u tũku u[^ckt]
PFX 614 u tũgu u[ckt]
PFX 614 0 ũkũ [bghmnr]
PFX 614 0 ũgũ [ckt]
PFX 614 a ũkwa a[^ckt]
PFX 614 a ũgwa a[ckt]
PFX 614 e ũkwa e[^ckt]
PFX 614 e ũgwe e[ckt]
PFX 614 i ũkũi i[^ckt]
PFX 614 i ũgũi i[ckt]
PFX 614 ĩ ũkwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 614 ĩ ũgwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 614 o ũkuo o[^ckt]
PFX 614 o ũguo o[ckt]
PFX 614 u ũku u[^ckt]
PFX 614 u ũgu u[ckt]
PFX 614 0 mũkũ [bghmnr]
PFX 614 0 mũgũ [ckt]
PFX 614 a mũkwa a[^ckt]
PFX 614 a mũgwa a[ckt]
PFX 614 e mũkwa e[^ckt]
PFX 614 e mũgwe e[ckt]
PFX 614 i mũkũi i[^ckt]
PFX 614 i mũgũi i[ckt]
PFX 614 ĩ mũkwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 614 ĩ mũgwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 614 o mũkuo o[^ckt]
PFX 614 o mũguo o[ckt]
PFX 614 u mũku u[^ckt]
PFX 614 u mũgu u[ckt]
PFX 614 0 akũ [bghmnr]
PFX 614 0 agũ [ckt]
PFX 614 a akwa a[^ckt]
PFX 614 a agwa a[ckt]
PFX 614 e akwa e[^ckt]
PFX 614 e agwe e[ckt]
PFX 614 i akũi i[^ckt]
PFX 614 i agũi i[ckt]
PFX 614 ĩ akwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 614 ĩ agwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 614 o akuo o[^ckt]
PFX 614 o aguo o[ckt]
PFX 614 u aku u[^ckt]
PFX 614 u agu u[ckt]
PFX 614 0 makũ [bghmnr]
PFX 614 0 magũ [ckt]
PFX 614 a makwa a[^ckt]
PFX 614 a magwa a[ckt]
PFX 614 e makwa e[^ckt]
PFX 614 e magwe e[ckt]
PFX 614 i makũi i[^ckt]
PFX 614 i magũi i[ckt]
PFX 614 ĩ makwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 614 ĩ magwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 614 o makuo o[^ckt]
PFX 614 o maguo o[ckt]
PFX 614 u maku u[^ckt]
PFX 614 u magu u[ckt]
PFX 614 0 ĩkũ [bghmnr]
PFX 614 0 ĩgũ [ckt]
PFX 614 a ĩkwa a[^ckt]
PFX 614 a ĩgwa a[ckt]
PFX 614 e ĩkwa e[^ckt]
PFX 614 e ĩgwe e[ckt]
PFX 614 i ĩkũi i[^ckt]
PFX 614 i ĩgũi i[ckt]
PFX 614 ĩ ĩkwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 614 ĩ ĩgwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 614 o ĩkuo o[^ckt]
PFX 614 o ĩguo o[ckt]
PFX 614 u ĩku u[^ckt]
PFX 614 u ĩgu u[ckt]
PFX 614 0 rĩkũ [bghmnr]
PFX 614 0 rĩgũ [ckt]
PFX 614 a rĩkwa a[^ckt]
PFX 614 a rĩgwa a[ckt]
PFX 614 e rĩkwa e[^ckt]
PFX 614 e rĩgwe e[ckt]
PFX 614 i rĩkũi i[^ckt]
PFX 614 i rĩgũi i[ckt]
PFX 614 ĩ rĩkwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 614 ĩ rĩgwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 614 o rĩkuo o[^ckt]
PFX 614 o rĩguo o[ckt]
PFX 614 u rĩku u[^ckt]
PFX 614 u rĩgu u[ckt]
PFX 614 0 gĩkũ [bghmnr]
PFX 614 0 gĩgũ [ckt]
PFX 614 a gĩkwa a[^ckt]
PFX 614 a gĩgwa a[ckt]
PFX 614 e gĩkwa e[^ckt]
PFX 614 e gĩgwe e[ckt]
PFX 614 i gĩkũi i[^ckt]
PFX 614 i gĩgũi i[ckt]
PFX 614 ĩ gĩkwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 614 ĩ gĩgwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 614 o gĩkuo o[^ckt]
PFX 614 o gĩguo o[ckt]
PFX 614 u gĩku u[^ckt]
PFX 614 u gĩgu u[ckt]
PFX 614 0 cikũ [bghmnr]
PFX 614 0 cigũ [ckt]
PFX 614 a cikwa a[^ckt]
PFX 614 a cigwa a[ckt]
PFX 614 e cikwa e[^ckt]
PFX 614 e cigwe e[ckt]
PFX 614 i cikũi i[^ckt]
PFX 614 i cigũi i[ckt]
PFX 614 ĩ cikwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 614 ĩ cigwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 614 o cikuo o[^ckt]
PFX 614 o ciguo o[ckt]
PFX 614 u ciku u[^ckt]
PFX 614 u cigu u[ckt]
PFX 614 0 ikũ [bghmnr]
PFX 614 0 igũ [ckt]
PFX 614 a ikwa a[^ckt]
PFX 614 a igwa a[ckt]
PFX 614 e ikwa e[^ckt]
PFX 614 e igwe e[ckt]
PFX 614 i ikũi i[^ckt]
PFX 614 i igũi i[ckt]
PFX 614 ĩ ikwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 614 ĩ igwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 614 o ikuo o[^ckt]
PFX 614 o iguo o[ckt]
PFX 614 u iku u[^ckt]
PFX 614 u igu u[ckt]
PFX 614 0 rũkũ [bghmnr]
PFX 614 0 rũgũ [ckt]
PFX 614 a rũkwa a[^ckt]
PFX 614 a rũgwa a[ckt]
PFX 614 e rũkwa e[^ckt]
PFX 614 e rũgwe e[ckt]
PFX 614 i rũkũi i[^ckt]
PFX 614 i rũgũi i[ckt]
PFX 614 ĩ rũkwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 614 ĩ rũgwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 614 o rũkuo o[^ckt]
PFX 614 o rũguo o[ckt]
PFX 614 u rũku u[^ckt]
PFX 614 u rũgu u[ckt]
PFX 614 0 gakũ [bghmnr]
PFX 614 0 gagũ [ckt]
PFX 614 a gakwa a[^ckt]
PFX 614 a gagwa a[ckt]
PFX 614 e gakwa e[^ckt]
PFX 614 e gagwe e[ckt]
PFX 614 i gakũi i[^ckt]
PFX 614 i gagũi i[ckt]
PFX 614 ĩ gakwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 614 ĩ gagwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 614 o gakuo o[^ckt]
PFX 614 o gaguo o[ckt]
PFX 614 u gaku u[^ckt]
PFX 614 u gagu u[ckt]
PFX 614 0 gũkũ [bghmnr]
PFX 614 0 gũgũ [ckt]
PFX 614 a gũkwa a[^ckt]
PFX 614 a gũgwa a[ckt]
PFX 614 e gũkwa e[^ckt]
PFX 614 e gũgwe e[ckt]
PFX 614 i gũkũi i[^ckt]
PFX 614 i gũgũi i[ckt]
PFX 614 ĩ gũkwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 614 ĩ gũgwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 614 o gũkuo o[^ckt]
PFX 614 o gũguo o[ckt]
PFX 614 u gũku u[^ckt]
PFX 614 u gũgu u[ckt]
PFX 614 0 hakũ [bghmnr]
PFX 614 0 hagũ [ckt]
PFX 614 a hakwa a[^ckt]
PFX 614 a hagwa a[ckt]
PFX 614 e hakwa e[^ckt]
PFX 614 e hagwe e[ckt]
PFX 614 i hakũi i[^ckt]
PFX 614 i hagũi i[ckt]
PFX 614 ĩ hakwĩ ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 614 ĩ hagwĩ ĩ[ckt]
PFX 614 o hakuo o[^ckt]
PFX 614 o haguo o[ckt]
PFX 614 u haku u[^ckt]
PFX 614 u hagu u[ckt]
