Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/kik_KE.dic
aga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
agĩra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
akana/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
amũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
anganga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
araara/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
athama/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
atũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
barabaria/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
bura/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
buura/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
cama/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
caria/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ceema/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
ciara/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ciira/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
cinũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
comora/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
cunga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
cuuka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
egeka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
endia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
enyũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
eretha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
gaatha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
gamba/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
garũrũka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
geeria/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
gema/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
geria/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
giria/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
gonderera/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
guma/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
gurara/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
guthũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
gwa/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
gũa/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
gũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
haata/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
haka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hambata/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hanyũka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
harwo/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
he/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
heha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
henia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
hiha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hinga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hinya/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hiũha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hona/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
hooya/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
huha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
huna/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
huuha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
huumba/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
huurũka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hĩngĩca/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hĩtia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hũndũka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hũthĩra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hũũna/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
icũhia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ihũga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ikara/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
imba/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
inamania/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ingĩra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kaana/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
keera/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
kira/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kora/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
kumutha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kunũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kĩra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kũria/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
mata/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
meria/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
munya/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
nengera/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
ng'ung'ua/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
nora/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
nyiha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ona/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
raacia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
rathima/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
renga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
riinga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
riũka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
rumia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
rwara/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
rĩma/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
rũma/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
rũnga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
taha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tanga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tarũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
teithũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
temenga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
teretha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
thaata/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
theca/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
theenga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
thenga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
thiinga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thikũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thioma/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
thita/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thiĩka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thogotha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
thoora/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
thuguma/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thuura/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thĩĩnja/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tiga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tinia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
toboka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
tonga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
tothoka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
tubĩra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tumũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
turuma/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tuunya/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
twaara/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tũũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
umbũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ĩhia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ĩra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ũma/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ũmbũka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ũmĩrĩra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ũria/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
